Utah statutes.
4-39-201.   Fencing, posts, and gates.

(1)  Each domesticated elk facility shall, at a minimum, meet the requirements of this section and shall be constructed to prevent the movement of domesticated elk into or out of the facility.

(2) (a)  All perimeter fences and gates shall be:

(i)  a minimum of eight feet above ground level; and

(ii)  constructed of hi-tensile steel.

(b)  At least the bottom four feet shall be mesh with a maximum mesh size of 6" x 6".

(c)  The remaining four feet shall be mesh with a maximum mesh size of 12" x 6".

(3)  The minimum wire gauge shall be 14-1/2 gauge for a 2 woven hi-tensile fence.

(4)  All perimeter gates at the entrances of domesticated elk handling facilities shall be locked, with consecutive or self-closing gates when animals are present.

(5)  Posts shall be:

(a) (i)  constructed of treated wood which is at least four inches in diameter; or

(ii)  constructed of a material with the strength equivalent of Subsection (5)(a)(i);

(b)  spaced no more than 30 feet apart if one stay is used, or 20 feet apart if no stays are used; and

(c)  at least eight feet above ground level and two feet below ground level.

(6)  Stays, between the posts, shall be:

(a)  constructed of treated wood or steel;

(b)  spaced no more than 15 feet from any post; and

(c)  at least eight feet above ground level, and two feet below ground level.

(7)  Corner posts and gate posts shall be braced wood or its strength equivalent.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

